Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB724.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Data Center Fair Share Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Bureau of Investigation and Enforcement." The Bureau of Investigation and Enforcement within the commission."Commission." The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission."Community benefits agreement." A legally binding contract 12345678910111213141516171819 negotiated and agreed to between developers and community-based organizations that serves to mitigate local impacts of development in which benefits are specific, measurable, actionable, relevant to the community's needs, time-bound and supported by the broader community."Community-based organization." A workforce development and training organization, labor union, local government entity, environmental advocacy organization or public or private nonprofit organization or entity that is representative of the host community or a significant segment of the host community and works to meet community needs."Fund." The Data Center LIHEAP Enhancement Fund established under section 5(a)."Host community." A municipality within which a large load customer's facility is located and any other municipality within a 10-mile radius of the facility's borders."Large load customer." A facility, campus of facilities or array of interconnected facilities in this Commonwealth that meets all of the following criteria:(1) Is used by a business entity or other enterprise to operate, manage or maintain a computer, group of computers or other organized assembly of hardware and software for the primary purpose of processing, storing, retrieving or transmitting data.(2) Has a gross aggregate electric peak demand, not reflecting any reductions attributable to co-located electric generation, of 25 megawatts or greater.(3) Is interconnected to a public utility at a single point of interconnection or multiple interconnection points within 20 miles of each other or is interconnected to 20260SB0724PN1555 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 multiple public utilities within this Commonwealth at multiple interconnection points within 20 miles of each other."Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program" or "LIHEAP." A federally funded program that provides financial assistance in the form of cash and crisis grants to low-income households for home energy bills and is administered by the Department of Human Services."Public utility." As defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Ratepayer." A retail customer of a public utility that purchases electric service for consumption."Renewable energy." Solar, wind energy, biomass or hydroelectric power."Socially disadvantaged population." A group whose members have been subjected to racial, ethnic or gender prejudice because of their identity as a member of the group."Universal service and energy conservation." As defined in 66 Pa.C.S. §§ 2202 (relating to definitions) and 2803 (relating to definitions).Section 3. Duties of commission.(a) Temporary regulations.--(1) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this act, the commission shall promulgate temporary regulations no later than 120 days after the effective date of this paragraph, inclusive of a public comment period of at least 30 days.(2) Temporary regulations under this subsection shall expire not later than two years after publication.(3) The commission may promulgate temporary regulations 20260SB0724PN1555 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that are not subject to:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(4) The commission's authority to promulgate temporary regulations under this subsection shall expire two years after the effective date of this paragraph. Prior to the expiration of this authority, the commission shall initiate the process to promulgate final regulations in accordance with State law and subsection (b) so that the final regulations take effect upon the expiration of the temporary regulations or promulgation of the final regulations, whichever occurs first.(b) Regulation requirements.--Regulations promulgated under subsection (a) shall include, at a minimum, provisions relating to all of the following:(1) Deposits or financial security required from large load customers.(2) Calculations of contributions in aid of construction for transmission and distribution infrastructure.(3) Minimum contract terms between large load customers and public utilities that require a large load customer to 20260SB0724PN1555 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 satisfy minimum contract terms for at least 15 years if the large load customer ceases operations or otherwise materially changes its service requirements.(4) Load ramping schedules to ensure infrastructure adequacy.(5) Exit or early termination fees.(6) Measures to prevent circumvention of the large load customer's threshold through multiple facilities, interconnection points or metering points.(7) Utility tracking of all costs to serve large load customers and verification that revenues collected exceed costs incurred.(8) Curtailment of some or all of a large load customer's load prior to the loads of other customer types to the maximum extent practicable during emergency conditions.(9) Measures to limit the amount of electricity an electric generation supplier as defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 2803 (relating to definitions) can provide to a large load customer to no more than 25% of the energy produced in a calendar year.(10) An end-of-contract process providing sufficient notice prior to the expiration, renewal or material modification of a large load customer's service contract with a public utility.(11) Requirements that large load customers contribute to the public utility's universal service and energy conservation program, consistent with the requirements for those programs in 66 Pa.C.S. §§ 2203(6), (7), (8), (9) and (10) (relating to standards for restructuring of natural gas utility industry) and 2804(8) and (9) (relating to standards 20260SB0724PN1555 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for restructuring of electric industry).(12) Adoption of a rebuttable presumption for cost recovery as provided under section 4(c).(13) Minimum contract terms for and Bureau of Investigation and Enforcement enforcement of the requirement of large load customers to enter community benefits agreements under section 7.(14) Certification and expedited interconnection standards under section 8.Section 4. Recovery of costs.(a) Cost recovery.--A public utility may not recover from ratepayers that are not large load customers, whether through base rates, riders, surcharges or any other ratemaking mechanism, costs that would not have been incurred but for the requirements of the large load customer.(b) Cost of service study.--A public utility that serves or is reasonably expected to serve large load customers shall be required to submit a full cost of service study when seeking a rate increase under 66 Pa.C.S. § 1308 (relating to voluntary changes in rates) to support the public utility's proposed allocation of shared or indirect costs that benefit multiple customer classes, including large load customers.(c) Rebuttable presumption.--(1) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that costs as described in subsection (a) are exclusively for the benefit of the large load customer and that the costs shall be assigned to the large load customer.(2) A public utility may not assign costs to ratepayers that are not large load customers based on generalized, ancillary or theoretical benefits to those ratepayers absent 20260SB0724PN1555 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 actual, quantifiable evidence demonstrating that the costs incurred were necessary for a purpose other than the electricity demand of the large load customer or where the costs incurred produce less value to such ratepayers, on a unitized basis, than the value that alternative public utility investment could have produced absent the requirements of the large load customer.Section 5. Contributions to Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program.(a) Fund.--(1) The Data Center LIHEAP Enhancement Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury.(2) The Department of Human Services, in collaboration with the State Treasurer, shall administer the fund.(3) The Department of Human Services shall use the money from the fund to implement a supplemental program to enhance the Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program. The supplemental program shall include a summer cooling component.(b) Sources of money.--The fund shall consist of all of the following:(1) Payments made under subsection (c).(2) Interest accrued on the money in the fund.(3) Money from any other source authorized for this purpose by Federal or State law.(c) Annual payments.--No later than June 30 of each year, each large load customer shall make a payment to the fund of $10,000 per megawatt based on its gross aggregate electric peak demand, not reflecting any reductions attributable to co-located electric generation.20260SB0724PN1555 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Continuing appropriation.--Money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the Department of Human Services for the purposes of this section.(e) Regulations.--The Department of Human Services, in collaboration with the State Treasurer, shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section.Section 6. Renewable energy requirements.A public utility that enters into a contract for electric service with a large load customer on or after the effective date of this section shall ensure that not less than 25% of the electricity supplied under the contract is generated from incremental renewable energy sources that have been certified by the commission, consistent with section 8, to constitute incremental additions of accredited unforced capacity.Section 7. Local agreements.(a) Community benefits agreement party requirements.--(1) A large load customer shall enter into one community benefits agreement with at least three community-based organizations that serve residents of the host municipalities and have operated in the host communities for at least three years.(2) At least half of the community-based organizations' signatories must have a mission to serve socially disadvantaged populations. Documentation of the community-based organizations' mission to serve socially disadvantaged populations shall include the community-based organizations' articles of incorporation or an affidavit describing organizational activities, partnership activities, business plans, historical documents, curricula and any other relevant programming.20260SB0724PN1555 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Community benefits agreement contents.--A large load customer shall pay an amount to be determined by the parties and memorialized in the community benefits agreement under subsection (a). The amount to be paid shall not be less than 10% of the overall cost of the project and can be made in one-time or recurring payments. Residents of the host community shall be the intended beneficiaries of the community benefits agreement. The specific terms of community benefits agreements may vary and may include any of the following:(1) Workforce development, job quality and job access provisions that include:(i) Terms of employment, including wages and benefits, employment status, workplace health and safety, scheduling and career advancement opportunities.(ii) Worker recruitment, screening and hiring strategies and practices, targeted hiring planning and execution, investment in workforce training, apprenticeships and education and worker input and representation in decision making affecting employment and training.(2) Funding for or provision of specific environmental benefits that do not primarily benefit the large load customer, including monitoring and strengthening environmental or public health plans and actions.(3) Funding for public infrastructure projects and public safety, including annual contributions to local fire and first responders, to compensate for increased need of specialized training and gear.(4) Funding for or provision of specific community improvements or amenities, including park and playground 20260SB0724PN1555 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equipment, urban greening, enhanced safety crossings, paving roads and bike paths.(5) Funding for affordable housing, home repair, efficiency and weatherization programs.(6) Commitments to periodically meet with community-based organizations and the public to review monitoring reports on electricity consumption, water consumption, water discharge and air pollution.(7) Financial assistance to assist municipal or citizen-led air and water quality monitoring.(8) Funding that supports individuals or community-based organizations from the host community to intervene in public utility ratepayer cases.(9) Funding to a nonprofit or community-based organization.(10) Funding and reimbursement of costs for technical assistance and support, including consulting attorneys, consulting other community-based organizations, negotiation trainings, facilitator services, monitoring activities and any other services the community-based organization deems relevant.(c) Effect of agreements.--(1) A community benefits agreement shall be legally binding and inure to the benefit of the parties and their successors and assigns.(2) Nothing in this act shall prevent a municipality from enacting local ordinances with additional community benefits.(d) Community benefits agreement public meeting requirement.--20260SB0724PN1555 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Prior to community-based organizations proffering signatures, a large load customer must hold a public meeting to discuss the drafted contents of the agreement with the host community. The large load customer shall publish notice of the public meeting in a local newspaper of general circulation and on the large load customer's publicly accessible Internet website at least two weeks in advance but not more than one month prior to the public meeting date.(2) The large load customer shall make available the full content of the agreement prior to the start of the public meeting by posting the agreement to the large load customer's publicly accessible Internet website and printing paper copies for public meeting attendees.(e) Enforcement.--(1) A large load customer shall file a copy of each community benefits agreement with the Bureau of Investigation and Enforcement. The Bureau of Investigation and Enforcement shall review the community benefits agreement and certify that the community benefits agreement satisfies the signatory requirements.(2) The Bureau of Investigation and Enforcement shall maintain a public database of all executed community benefits agreements in this Commonwealth.Section 8. Certification and expedited interconnection for large load customers bringing incremental energy resources.(a) Certification program.--(1) The commission shall establish a program to certify large load customers that have brought or plan to bring incremental energy resources.20260SB0724PN1555 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Certification shall be based on a binding financial commitment by a large load customer, including a power purchase agreement, to enable an incremental energy resource or resources, located within the territory of PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., or its successors, equivalent on a one-for-one accredited unforced capacity basis, including a reasonable reserve margin, tied to the large load customer's ramp and utilization schedule, through any combination of the following:(i) Placement in service of a new generation resource or combined generation and storage resource.(ii) Uprate or expansion of an existing generation resource to the extent of the uprated capacity.(iii) Participation in a demand response product, if participation continues for the duration of the certification period or until the large load customer has brought additional energy capacity equivalent to the capacity value of the demand response product.(iv) Another incremental addition of accredited unforced capacity as measured by the applicable regional transmission organization or independent system operator.(b) Interconnection priority.--The commission shall require electric distribution companies to prioritize the interconnection of large load customers certified under subsection (a) and, for interconnections subject to State jurisdiction, to prioritize the interconnection of paired generation resources or storage resources associated with a certified large load customer.Section 9. Transparency, filing and enforcement.(a) Filing requirement.--20260SB0724PN1555 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A public utility shall file with the commission a copy of each contract executed with a large load customer, including a copy of its community benefits agreements, upon certification by the Bureau of Investigation and Enforcement under section 7, on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) The public utility shall include with the filing sufficient documentation to permit the commission to conduct the review under paragraph (3).(3) The commission shall review each contract under paragraph (1) to determine all of the following:(i) The impact on the grid system of PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., regional transmission organization or its successor.(ii) The effect on the reliability of that grid system.(iii) The impact on ratepayers.(iv) Compliance with the requirements of this act.(4) A public utility shall provide a copy of a contract filed under this section to the Office of Consumer Advocate, the Office of Small Business Advocate and the Bureau of Investigation and Enforcement.(b) Void contract provisions.--Any provision of a contract, agreement or similar instrument executed with a large load customer on or after the effective date of this subsection shall be void and unenforceable if the provision has the purpose or effect of either:(1) preventing the commission, the Bureau of Investigation and Enforcement or a public utility from carrying out their duties under this act; or20260SB0724PN1555 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) preventing or restricting the disclosure of any terms of the contract.(c) Enforcement.--A violation of this act shall be subject to enforcement by the commission and the Bureau of Investigation and Enforcement under 66 Pa.C.S. Ch. 33 (relating to violations and penalties).Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB0724PN1555 - 14 - 12345678